Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
CHAPTER 7 Georgia Firefighters’ Pension Fund

Cross references.

Authorization of taxation for paying pensions and other benefits and costs under a firemen’s pension system or systems, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. X, Para. IV.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of General Applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Fireman’s Pension Fund, Chapter 513-7-1.